Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.501 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and Indian Hills Road in
Cleveland County shall be designated as the “Toby Keith Memorial
Interchange”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
markers bearing that name to be placed at the interchange.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective February 5, 2027.

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1475 Page 2